Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB621.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXIX-JPROHIBITING TAX DEDUCTIONS FOR ANTI-UNION ACTIVITIESSection 2901-J. Scope of article.This article prohibits domestic entities and foreign entities that are corporations operating in this Commonwealth from taking tax deductions for expenses incurred in opposing unionization 12345678910111213141516171819202122 efforts of their workers.Section 2902-J. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Corporation." A domestic entity or foreign entity incorporated for a purpose involving pecuniary profit, incidental or otherwise, to its shareholders or members, whether or not the business entity is a cooperative corporation."Domestic entity." A corporation that is formed under the laws of this Commonwealth and that exercises, whether in its own name or through a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, limited partnership, general partnership or other entity, any of the following privileges:(1) Doing business in this Commonwealth. (2) Carrying on activities in this Commonwealth, including solicitation.(3) Having capital or property employed or used in this Commonwealth.(4) Owning property in this Commonwealth."Foreign entity." A corporation that is organized by or under the laws of a jurisdiction other than this Commonwealth and that exercises, whether in its own name or through a corporation, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, limited partnership, partnership or other entity, any of the following privileges:(1) Doing business in this Commonwealth.(2) Carrying on activities in this Commonwealth, 20250SB0621PN0632 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including solicitation.(3) Having capital or property employed or used in this Commonwealth.(4) Owning property in this Commonwealth."General partnership." Either of the following:(1) A partnership as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 8412(a) (relating to definitions).(2) An association whose internal affairs are governed by the laws of a jurisdiction other than this Commonwealth which would be a partnership if its internal affairs were governed by the laws of this Commonwealth."Labor organization." As follows:(1) An organization of any kind or an agency or employee representation committee or plan:(i) in which employees participate; and(ii) which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment or conditions of work.(2) The term does not include a labor organization that, by ritualistic practice, constitutional or bylaw proscription, tacit agreement among its members or otherwise, denies a person membership in the organization on account of race, creed, color or political affiliation."Limited liability company." An association formed under and subject to 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 88 (relating to limited liability companies)."Limited liability limited partnership." A domestic or foreign limited partnership for which there is in effect:(1) a statement of registration under 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 82 20250SB0621PN0632 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to limited liability partnerships and limited liability limited partnerships);(2) a provision of its certificate of limited partnership electing to be subject to 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 82; or(3) a similar filing or provision under the organic law of a foreign partnership."Limited liability partnership." A domestic or foreign general partnership for which there is in effect:(1) a statement of registration under 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 82; or(2) a similar filing under the organic law of a foreign general partnership."Limited partnership." Either of the following:(1) A limited partnership as defined in 15 Pa.C.S. § 8612(a) (relating to definitions).(2) An association whose internal affairs are governed by the laws of a jurisdiction other than this Commonwealth which would be a limited partnership if its internal affairs were governed by the laws of this Commonwealth.Section 2903-J. Prohibition.Except as provided in section 2904-J, a taxpayer that is a domestic entity or foreign entity subject to taxes under Article III, IV or VI shall be prevented from deducting business expenses that are related to an amount paid or incurred in connection with attempting to influence the taxpayer's employees with respect to a labor organization or the activities of a labor organization, including:(1) An amount paid or incurred by the taxpayer in connection with an action that results in any of the following:20250SB0621PN0632 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A complaint issued under 29 U.S.C. § 160 (relating to prevention of unfair labor practices) against the taxpayer for an unfair labor practice under 29 U.S.C. § 158(a) (relating to unfair labor practices) , unless an order of the National Labor Relations Board related to the complaint is set aside in full accordance with 29 U.S.C. § 160(e) or (f) . (ii) A settlement offer related to an investigation by the National Labor Relations Board of a charge of an unfair labor practice under 29 U.S.C. § 158(a) that results in a settlement of the charge without issuance of a complaint under 29 U.S.C. § 160 . (iii) A finding of interference, influence or coercion by a Federal court under 45 U.S.C. § 152 (relating to general duties) . (iv) A violation of the act of June 1, 1937 (P.L.1168, No.294), known as the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act.(v) A complaint of an unfair labor practice under the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Act.(vi) A violation of an order issued by the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board.(2) An amount paid or incurred, including wages, in producing, conducting or attending a meeting or training:(i) that includes employees of the taxpayer who are or who could become bargaining unit members or members of a craft or class under 45 U.S.C. Ch. 8 (relating to railway labor); and(ii) at which labor organizations or a labor organization activity is discussed.20250SB0621PN0632 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) An amount that is required to be reported under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 11 (relating to labor-management reporting and disclosure procedure) . Section 2904-J. Exceptions.Notwithstanding section 2903-J, the following shall not be treated as an amount paid or incurred in connection with attempting to influence the taxpayer's employees with respect to a labor organization or the activities of a labor organization:(1) An amount paid or incurred for communications or negotiations directly with the designated or selected representative of the employees of the taxpayer described under 29 U.S.C. § 159(a) (relating to representatives and elections) or 45 U.S.C. Ch. 8 (relating to railway labor) . (2) An amount paid or incurred for communications directly with shareholders, as may be required under 15 U.S.C. § 78m (relating to periodical and other reports) . (3) An amount paid or incurred for communications or consultation by the taxpayer in the process of voluntarily recognizing a labor organization as a r epresentative in accordance with 29 U.S.C. § 159 . (4) An amount paid or incurred for communications or consultation related to the operation of a labor-management partnership described in a collective bargaining agreement in effect between a representative of employees of the taxpayer and the taxpayer.(5) An amount paid or incurred for communications or consultation related to the operation of a grievance procedure described in a collective bargaining agreement in effect between a representative of employees of the taxpayer and the taxpayer.20250SB0621PN0632 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) An amount paid or incurred by a labor organization.(7) An amount paid or incurred for communicating material, including visual or audio media, required to be posted for, or provided to, employees of the taxpayer by law, including under the National Labor Relations Act (49 stat. 449, 29 U.S.C. § 151 et seq.) or 45 U.S.C. Ch. 8 . Section 2. The addition of Article XXIX-J of the act shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0621PN0632 - 7 - 12345678910